Colorado statutes. TITLE 43 Transportation
PART 2
AUTO AND TOURIST CAMPS, HOTELS, AND MOTELS

Cross references:

For penalty for false advertising of accommodations and rates of hotel facilities, see article 14 of title 18.

43-5-201. Definitions.

As used in this part 2, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Auto camp" means any auto or tourist camp, park or campsite, tourist court, auto court, auto hotel, or trailer coach court owned, operated, controlled, or leased by any person, firm, association, or corporation for the purpose of renting, leasing, or otherwise providing parking sites or spaces for any motor vehicle, trailer, semitrailer, or trailer coach, irrespective of the number of parking sites or spaces provided. The term does not include mobile home parks with respect to spaces rented for the parking and hooking up of trailer coaches or mobile homes for use as residences.

"Hotel" or "hotel facility" means an establishment engaged in the business of furnishing overnight room accommodations primarily for transient persons and which maintains or makes available, as a part of its services to its patrons, facilities for the parking or storage of motor vehicles.

"Motor vehicle" includes all motor vehicles propelled by power other than muscular power, except road rollers, fire wagons, fire engines, police patrol wagons, police ambulances, and such vehicles as run only upon rails or tracks or travel through the air.

"Owner" includes any person, firm, association, or corporation renting a motor vehicle or having the exclusive use thereof under a lease or otherwise for a period greater than thirty days.

Source:

L. 29:

p. 466, § 1.

L. 31:

p. 458, § 1.

CSA:

C. 16, § 372.

CRS 53:

§ 13-14-1.

L. 55:

p. 207, § 1.

L. 59:

p. 227, § 9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 13-14-1.

L. 71:

p. 259, § 1.

L. 73:

p. 235, § 11.

L. 75:

(1) amended, p. 1473, § 29, effective July 18.

43-5-202. Licenses - fee - penalty. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 29:

p. 467, § 2.

CSA:

C. 16, § 373.

CRS 53:

§ 13-14-2.

L. 55:

p. 207, § 2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 13-14-2.

L. 71:

p. 259, § 2.

L. 77:

Entire section repealed, p. 1941, § 3, effective May 20.

43-5-203. Required records.

It is the duty of every person, firm, association, or corporation owning, operating, controlling, or leasing an auto camp or hotel to keep and maintain in the auto camp or hotel an easily accessible and permanent daily record of all automobiles stored, kept, parked, or maintained in said auto camp and all automobiles of patrons of such hotel which are parked in facilities maintained or made available exclusively for such patrons by such hotel. The record shall be kept in a book or on cards, consecutively numbered, in a uniform manner approved by the Colorado state patrol. The record shall include the name and address of the owner of the automobile stored, parked, kept, or maintained in said auto camp or hotel facility, together with the make, body style, and year of said automobile and the license number, if any. All such records shall be preserved for a period of three years.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 29:

p. 468, § 3.

CSA:

C. 16, § 374.

L. 51:

p. 159, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 13-14-3.

L. 59:

p. 227, § 10.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 13-14-3.

L. 71:

p. 260, § 3.

L. 72:

pp. 555, 588, §§ 6, 46.

L. 73:

p. 243, § 29.

L. 77:

(1) amended and (2) repealed, pp. 1940, 1941, §§ 1, 3, effective May 20.

43-5-204. Record open for inspection by officers.

The books and records of every auto camp and hotel shall be open for inspection to members of the Colorado state patrol and all peace officers of the state.

Source:

L. 29:

p. 468, § 4.

CSA:

C. 16, § 375.

CRS 53:

§ 13-14-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 13-14-4.

L. 71:

p. 260, § 4.

43-5-205. Allowing stolen motor vehicle to be stored - penalty.

Any person who knowingly allows or permits any stolen motor vehicle to be stored, kept, parked, or maintained in any licensed auto camp or hotel facility within the state of Colorado commits a civil infraction. This provision shall not be exclusive of any other penalties prescribed by any existing or future laws for the theft or unauthorized taking of a motor vehicle.

Source:

L. 29:

p. 468, § 5.

CSA:

C. 16, § 376.

CRS 53:

§ 13-14-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 13-14-5.

L. 71:

p. 260, § 5.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3326, § 778, effective March 1, 2022.

Cross references:

For the penalty for a civil infraction, see § 18-1.3-503.

43-5-206. Revocation of license. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 29:

p. 468, § 6.

CSA:

C. 16, § 377.

CRS 53:

§ 13-14-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 13-14-6.

L. 71:

p. 260, § 6.

L. 77:

Entire section repealed, p. 1941, § 3, effective May 20.

43-5-207. Penalty.

Any person violating any of the provisions of this part 2, except as set forth in section 43-5-205, commits a civil infraction.

Source:

L. 29:

p. 470, § 9.

CSA:

C. 16, § 380.

CRS 53:

§ 13-14-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 13-14-7.

L. 72:

p. 588, § 47.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 1940, § 2, effective May 20.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3326, § 779, effective March 1, 2022.

Cross references:

For the penalty for a civil infraction, see § 18-1.3-503.

43-5-208. Effective date - applicability. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 71:

p. 261, § 7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 13-14-8.

L. 77:

Entire section repealed, p. 1941, § 3, effective May 20.